Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.110

Core competencies for early care and education professionals and child and youth development professionals—Adoption and implementation—Updating.

By December 31, 2012, the department shall adopt core competencies for early care and education professionals and child and youth development professionals and develop an implementation plan. The department shall incorporate the core competencies into all appropriate professional development opportunities including, but not limited to, the quality rating and improvement system, the early childhood education and assistance program, child care licensing, and the early support for infants and toddlers program. The purpose of the core competencies is to serve as a foundation for what early care and education professionals and child and youth development professionals need to know and do to provide quality care for children. The core competencies must be reviewed and updated every five years.

[ 2012 c 149 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.215.105.]

NOTES:

Findings—2012 c 149: "The legislature finds that adopting statewide core competencies for early care and education professionals and child and youth development professionals is important because the competencies:

(1) Define what early care and education professionals and child and youth development professionals need to know and be able to do to provide quality care and education for children;

(2) Serve as the foundation for decisions and practices carried out by professionals in all early care and education settings and school-age child care settings;

(3) Establish a set of standards for early care and education professionals and child and youth development professionals that support the professionalism for the field;

(4) Are an integral part of a comprehensive professional development system; and

(5) Recognize existing standards met by nationally chartered nonprofit youth development agencies providing facility-based after school services for school-age children as relevant and sufficient standards." [ 2012 c 149 s 1.]